Vermont, session 2025-2026, H21.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 4854 is amended to read:
§ 4854. JUDGMENT FOR PLAINTIFF; WRIT OF POSSESSION
If the court finds that the plaintiff is entitled to possession of the premises,
the plaintiff shall have judgment for possession and rents due, damages, and
costs, and when a written rental agreement so provides, the court may award
reasonable attorney’s fees. A writ of possession shall issue on the date
judgment is entered, unless the court for good cause orders a stay. The writ
shall direct the any sheriff of the county in which the property or a portion
thereof is located to serve the writ upon the defendant and, not earlier than 14
days after the writ is served, to put the plaintiff into possession.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 5, 2025
VT LEG #383391 v.1